Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3310
Relevant licensing authority, defined.

Relevant licensing authority means a board, bureau, commission, committee, department, political subdivision, or other public or private entity that is authorized under the laws of the State of Nebraska to grant, issue, or renew a professional, occupational, or recreational license.

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 10.